Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2039.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Innovative Assessment and Accountability Demonstration Authority.--(a) The department shall develop an innovative State assessment and accountability system as a pilot program to measure student achievement and growth in this Commonwealth in collaboration with the General Assembly, educators and school leaders, stakeholders representing the interests of children, parents and students.(b) The department shall hold at least four public hearings 1234567891011121314151617181920 in different geographical areas of this Commonwealth to gather stakeholder input for the design of the system.(c) Upon the conclusion of the public hearings and at least ninety (90) days prior to May 1, 2026, a final plan shall be published and posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website for public comment for at least thirty (30) days. The department shall consider comments made by the public and may revise the plan.(d) At least forty-five (45) days prior to May 1, 2026, the department shall provide a notice of intent to submit an Innovative Assessment Demonstration Authority application to the United States Secretary of Education.(e) By May 1, 2026, the department shall submit the application to the United States Secretary of Education requesting demonstration authority under the Every Student Succeeds Act, 20 U.S.C. § 6364(e) (relating to innovative assessment and accountability demonstration authority).(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Innovative State assessment and accountability system." A system of assessments that may include:(1) competency-based assessments, instructionally embedded assessments, interim assessments, cumulative year-end assessments and performance-based assessments that combine into an annual summative determination for a student, or another innovative assessment design that meets the requirements under the Every Student Succeeds Act, that may be administered through 20250HB2039PN2609 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer adaptive assessments; and(2) assessments that validate when students are ready to demonstrate mastery or proficiency and allow for differentiated student support based on individual learning needs.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2039PN2609 - 3 - 12345